Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
CHAPTER 4 Relocation Assistance and Land Acquisition
for those Displaced by
Federal-Aid Projects

Cross references.

Private ways and specific powers, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. III, Para. II, and Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. II.

Housing generally, T. 8, C. 3.

Clearance and rehabilitation of blighted areas, T. 8, C. 4.

Relocation assistance for individuals and businesses displaced by federal-aid and state-aid highway projects, T. 32, C. 8.

Law reviews.

For survey article on recent developments in Georgia law of remedies, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 397 (1982).

For annual survey article on local government law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2000).

22-4-1.
Short title; “Uniform Act” defined.

This chapter shall be known as “The Georgia Relocation Assistance and Land Acquisition Policy Act.”

As used in this chapter, the term “Uniform Act” means the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, as amended by the Uniform Relocation Act Amendments of 1987, Title IV of Public Law 100-17.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 213, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, quotation marks that enclosed “Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970,” and “Uniform Relocation Act Amendments of 1987,” were deleted in subsection (b).

22-4-2.
Legislative findings and declaration of necessity.

The General Assembly finds and declares that the prompt and equitable relocation and reestablishment of persons, businesses, farmers, and nonprofit organizations displaced when the state, any of its agencies or institutions (other than the Department of Transportation), or any county, municipal corporation, school district, political subdivision, public authority, public agency, public corporation, or public instrumentality, excluding electric membership corporations as defined in paragraph (3) of Code Section 46-3-171, (collectively referred to in this chapter as “several public entities”) created under the Constitution and laws of the State of Georgia acquires land, with federal financial assistance, for a public use, are necessary to ensure that certain individuals do not suffer disproportionate injuries as a result of programs designed for the benefit of the public as a whole. The General Assembly finds and declares that the establishment of uniform fair land acquisition policies will be beneficial to the public. The General Assembly finds that the Congress of the United States has, by enacting the Uniform Act, made funds available for relocation assistance and the implementation of certain land acquisition policies. The General Assembly further finds that the Congress of the United States has by the aforesaid statute provided for the total cessation after July 1, 1972, of federal financial assistance for public works projects which will displace persons or businesses unless the state complies with the requirements of the Uniform Act. The General Assembly finds and declares that the construction of public works projects with federal financial assistance is vital to the state and is in the best interest of the people of the state and that providing for the continuation of federal financial assistance at the highest possible level for public works projects is a legitimate public purpose. The General Assembly further finds that the cost of providing the assistance and services provided for in this chapter should be, and the same are declared to be, part of the necessary cost of federal-aid public works projects.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 213, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 22.

Cross references.

Federal financial aid for rehabilitation and redevelopment of blighted areas, §

8-4-10

.

22-4-3.
Applicability of Code Section 22-1-1 to chapter.

The definitions contained in paragraphs (6) and (8) of Code Section 22-1-1 shall not apply to this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-4-3

; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 17/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was created as part of the Code revision and was thus enacted by Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to those condemnation proceedings filed on or after February 9, 2006, where title has not vested in the condemning authority unless constitutionally prohibited.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

22-4-4.
Payments by public entities for relocation and replacement housing expenses.

The several public entities are authorized to and shall make or approve the payments required by Section 210 of the Uniform Act for the relocation expenses and replacement housing expenses of any person, family, business, farm operation, or nonprofit organization displaced by federal-aid projects in the state, the costs of which are now or hereafter financed in whole or in part from federal funds allocated to any of the several public entities.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 213, § 3.

22-4-5.
Providing of relocation assistance advisory services by public entities.

The several public entities are authorized to and shall provide the relocation assistance advisory services required by Section 205 of the Uniform Act for any person, family, business, farm operation, or nonprofit organization displaced by federal-aid projects in the state, the costs of which are now or hereafter financed in whole or in part from federal funds allocated to any of the several public entities.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 4; Ga. L. 1989, p. 213, § 4.

22-4-6.
Payments by public entities for expenses incidental to property transfer, for mortgage penalties, and for property taxes.

The several public entities are authorized to and shall make or approve the payments required by Section 305(2) of the Uniform Act for expenses incidental to the transfer of real property acquired by any of the several public entities, for prepayment of mortgage penalties, and for a pro rata portion of real property taxes on real property acquired by any of the several public entities from any person, family, business, farm operation, or nonprofit organization displaced by federal-aid projects in the state, the costs of which are now or hereafter financed in whole or in part from federal funds allocated to any of the several public entities.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 213, § 5.

22-4-7.
Payments by public entities for litigation expenses in condemnation proceedings.

The several public entities are authorized to and shall make or approve the payments required by Section 305(2) of the Uniform Act for litigation expenses actually incurred by any person, family, business, farm operation, or nonprofit organization which is a condemnee in any condemnation proceeding brought by an acquiring public entity to acquire real property for a federal-aid project, the cost of which is now or hereafter financed in whole or in part from federal funds allocated to an acquiring public entity, if the final judgment is that the acquiring public entity cannot acquire the real property by condemnation or the condemnation proceeding is formally abandoned by the acquiring public entity.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 213, § 6.

22-4-8.
Payments by public entities for litigation expenses in inverse condemnation proceedings.

The several public entities are authorized to and shall make or approve the payments required by Section 305(2) of the Uniform Act for litigation expenses actually incurred by any person, family, business, farm operation, or nonprofit organization which is the plaintiff in any inverse condemnation proceeding brought against an acquiring public entity in which judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff for real property taken by the acquiring public entity in its execution of any federal-aid project, the costs of which are now or hereafter financed in whole or in part from federal funds allocated to the acquiring public entity.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 213, § 7.

Law reviews.

For survey article on recent developments in Georgia law of remedies, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 397 (1982).

22-4-9.
Policies guiding acquisition of real property for federal-aid projects.

In acquiring real property for any federal-aid project, the costs of which are financed in whole or in part from federal funds allocated to an acquiring public entity, such public entity shall be guided by the land acquisition policies required by Section 301 of the Uniform Act to the greatest extent practicable.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 213, § 8.

22-4-10.
Policies guiding acquisition of buildings, structures, and other improvements for federal-aid projects.

In acquiring property for any federal-aid project, the costs of which are financed in whole or in part from federal funds allocated to an acquiring public entity, the acquiring public entity shall be guided by the land acquisition policies relating to buildings, structures, and other improvements specified by Section (302) of the Uniform Act to the greatest extent practicable.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 9; Ga. L. 1989, p. 213, § 9; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 22.

22-4-11.
Adoption of rules; appeal and review.

The several public entities are authorized to make such rules as may be necessary to provide for the administration of the financial assistance authorized by this chapter.

The determination by the several public entities of the amount of any payment and to whom it shall be paid may be appealed and judicially reviewed in the manner prescribed by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 11.

22-4-11.1.
Exercise of powers granted under this chapter by municipal corporations with population of 350,000 or more; effect of this Code section on other laws.

In addition and supplementary to other powers provided by this chapter for the several public entities, any municipal corporation having a population of 350,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census may exercise the powers provided by this chapter for public works projects which are not financed in whole or in part from federal funds, but which are financed wholly or in part from the funds of any such municipal corporation or from other nonfederal funding sources, if the governing authority of any such municipal corporation shall first pass an ordinance or resolution stipulating that such funds are to be spent in good faith anticipation of whole or partial reimbursement from federal funds. The costs incurred by any such municipal corporation pursuant to the authority provided by this Code section shall be a part of the costs of public works projects. In carrying out the powers granted under this Code section any such municipal corporation shall be authorized to:

Provide all relocation assistance and payments as authorized by this chapter;

Establish and implement all acquisition policies and practices authorized under this chapter; and

Provide for reimbursement of all necessary expenses authorized under this chapter.

This Code section shall not be construed to repeal or affect in any manner Code Section 32-8-1, relating to relocation assistance for persons displaced by federal-aid highway projects.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1417, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 307, § 1.

22-4-12.
Functions provided in chapter as public purposes; effect of chapter on power to tax.

The providing of all of the relocation assistances and payments described in this chapter and, in connection with the acquisition of real property for public works projects or programs, the establishing of all of the policies and practices described in this chapter, and the paying or reimbursing of all of the expenses described in this chapter are declared to be necessary and shall and do constitute governmental functions undertaken for public purposes. Therefore, public funds may be expended by said public entities in furtherance of such functions, and those public entities that possess the power of taxation in relation to the public works projects and programs referred to in this subsection may exercise such power in furtherance thereof.

Nothing contained in this Code section should be construed as a grant of a power of taxation to any of the several public entities which do not possess, independently of this chapter, any powers of taxation. Rather, this Code section shall constitute a grant of the power of taxation in relation to the public purposes enumerated in subsection (a) of this Code section to such of the several public entities as possess, independently of this chapter, powers of taxation in relation to the particular public works project or program which is undertaken or sponsored by such public entity and which displaces a person, thereby giving rise to the necessity of relocation assistance and payments, or which requires the acquisition of real property, thereby necessitating the real property acquisition policies, practices, payments, and reimbursements described in this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 12.

22-4-13.
Payments under chapter as income or resources.

No payment received by a displaced person under this chapter shall be considered as income or resources for the purpose of determining the eligibility or extent of eligibility of any person for assistance under any state law or for the purposes of the state’s personal income tax law, corporation tax law, or other tax laws. These payments shall not be considered as income or resources of any recipient of public assistance, and the payment shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 13.

22-4-14.
Effect of chapter on condemnation proceedings.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as creating in any condemnation proceeding brought under the power of eminent domain any element of value or of damage.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 512, § 10.

22-4-15.
Authority of public entities to provide replacement housing when federal-aid project cannot proceed to actual construction.

The several public entities shall have the authority, as a last resort, to provide replacement housing when a federal-aid project financed in whole or in part with federal aid cannot proceed to actual construction because no comparable replacement sale or rental housing is available. In carrying out the relocation assistance activities, the several public entities shall be authorized to make payments, construct or reconstruct with their own forces, cause to be constructed or reconstructed, and purchase by deed or condemnation any real property for the purposes of providing replacement housing. The acquiring public entity may exchange, lease, or sell to the displaced person such replacement housing. Whenever any real property has been acquired under this Code section and thereafter the acquiring public entity determines that all or any part of such property or any interest therein is no longer needed for such purposes because of changed conditions, the acquiring public entity is authorized to dispose of such property or interest therein in accordance with Code Section 50-16-144.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-4-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 213, § 10.